District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
46 act may be cited as the “Deferred Retirement Option Program Amendment Act of 2025”.
47 Sec. 2. The Policemen and Firemen’s Retirement and Disability Act, approved September
48 1, 1916 (39 Stat. 718; D.C. Official Code § 5-701 et seq.) is amended as follows:
49 (a) Section 12(a) (D.C. Official Code § 5-701) is amended by adding new paragraphs (21)
50 and (22) to read as follows:
51 “(21) “Deferred retirement option program” means the retirement program established in
52 section 12(h-1).
53 “(22) “Eligible member” means, for the purposes of the deferred retirement option program
54 established in section 12(h-1), an individual who:
55 “(A) Meets the qualifications for retirement in section 12(h); and
56 “(B) Is:
57 “(i) A sworn employee of the Metropolitan Police Department who, at the
58 time of entering the deferred retirement option program, was a member of the Fraternal Order of
59 Police Metropolitan Police Department bargaining unit; or
60 “(ii) A sworn employee of the Fire and Emergency Medical Services
61 Department who, at the time of entering the deferred retirement option program, was covered by
62 the collective bargaining agreement between the District of Columbia Fire and Emergency
63 Medical Services Department and the International Association of Firefighters Local 36.”.
64 (b) A new section 12(h-1) is added to read as follows:
65 “Sec. 12(h-1). Deferred retirement option program.
66 “(a) There is established a deferred retirement option program (“DROP”) available to
67 eligible members, to be administered by the District of Columbia Retirement Board. The District
2

68 of Columbia Retirement Board shall create separate interest-bearing DROP accounts for
69 participating eligible members. The Board shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to
70 implement the DROP.
71 “(b) An eligible member shall be authorized to continue working and collecting his or her
72 salary while receiving monthly retirement benefits in his or her DROP account.
73 “(c)(1) Beginning 90 days after the effective date of this act, an eligible member may elect
74 to participate in the DROP by giving at least 60 days’ written advance notice to his or her
75 department head of his or her intention to participate and the date on which he or she intends to
76 begin participating.
77 “(3) An eligible member may participate in the DROP for up to 3 years. Upon
78 cessation of the eligible member’s participation, the eligible member shall permanently cease
79 employment with his or her employing department, except as provided in Section 2 of the Retired
80 Police Officer Redeployment Amendment Act of 1992, effective September 29, 1992 (D.C. Law
81 9-163; D.C. Official Code § 5-761), Section 2a of the Retired Police Officer Redeployment
82 Amendment Act of 1992, effective March 1, 2024 (D.C. Law 25-131; D.C. Official Code § 5-
83 761.01), and Section 2 of the Retired Police Officer Public Schools Security Personnel
84 Deployment Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Law 10-136; D.C. Official Code § 5-762).
85 “(d)(1) Payments made under this section shall be paid out of the District of Columbia
86 Police and Firefighters’ Retirement Fund established by the District of Columbia Retirement
87 Regulations Adoption Act of 1982 (D.C. Law 4-123).
88 “(2) On a monthly basis, an amount shall be deposited in a participating eligible
89 member’s DROP account equal to the amount that would have been payable to that participating
3

90 eligible member under section 12(h) of this subchapter had the participating eligible member
91 elected to retire pursuant to that section on the date he or she began participating in the DROP.
92 “(3) Any unused sick leave credited to a participating eligible member shall not be
93 used in computing the amount paid under paragraph (2) of this subsection and shall be carried
94 forward until the participating eligible member ceases participation.
95 “(4) Participating eligible members shall be eligible for the cost-of-living
96 adjustments determined by the District of Columbia Retirement Board in subsection 12(h)(i) of
97 this subchapter.
98 “(5) The District of Columbia Retirement Board shall set the applicable interest rate
99 as provided in subsection 12(h)(i) of this subchapter.
100 “(6) Participating eligible members entitled to medical leave pursuant to Section
101 623 of the Fire and Police Medical Leave and Limited Duty Amendment Act of 2004, effective
102 September 30, 2004 (D.C. Law 15-194; D.C. Official Code § 5-633) or Section 624 of the Fire
103 and Police Medical Leave and Limited Duty Amendment Act of 2004, effective September 30,
104 2004 (D.C. Law 15-194; D.C. Official Code § 5-634) shall cease participation in the DROP after
105 a period of 120 days on medical leave.
106 “(e)(1) A participating eligible member may cease participation at any time by providing
107 his or her department head with 60 days’ advance written notice. After ceasing participation, the
108 eligible member shall receive the distribution of the member’s DROP account balance, which may
109 be made in one of the following ways:
110 “(A) A lump sum distribution;
111 “(B) Rolled over to another qualified retirement plan or an IRA;
112 “(C) The purchase of an annuity; or
4

113 “(D) Any other method of distribution provided by the District of Columbia
114 Retirement Board.
115 “(2) The annuity payable to a participating eligible member upon his or her
116 cessation of participation shall be computed to include any increase based on the participating
117 eligible member’s unused sick leave as of the date the participating member ceases participation.
118 “(f)(1) If a participating eligible member becomes eligible for benefits under section 12(f)
119 of this subchapter, the participating eligible member shall cease DROP participation and
120 commence distribution of his or her DROP account balance. The monthly pension benefit under
121 section 12(f) of this subchapter shall be equal to the benefits as of the day he or she commenced
122 participation in DROP, as increased by the cost-of-living adjustments that would have accrued if
123 the member had actually retired on that date, and subject to increases for accumulated sick leave.
124 “(2) If a participating eligible member becomes eligible for benefits under section
125 12(g) of this subchapter, he or she may choose to cease participation in the DROP and become
126 eligible for benefits as of the day he or she commenced participation in the DROP, as increased by
127 the cost-of-living adjustments that would have accrued if the member had actually retired on that
128 date, and subject to increases for accumulated sick leave.
129 “(3) If a participating eligible member is involuntarily terminated, he or she shall
130 receive the remainder of the participating eligible member’s DROP account balance and the
131 annuity that he or she would have received had the participating eligible member retired on the
132 date he or she began participating in the DROP, as increased by the cost-of-living adjustments that
133 would have accrued if the participating eligible member had actually retired on that date, and
134 subject to increases for accumulated sick leave.”.
5

135 “(4) If a participating eligible member dies and his or her survivor is eligible for
136 benefits under section 12(k) of this subchapter, his or her survivor shall receive those benefits in
137 addition to the distribution of the participating eligible member’s DROP account balance. The
138 monthly pension shall be equal to the benefits as of the day he or she commenced participation in
139 DROP, as increased by the cost-of-living adjustments that would have accrued if the member had
140 actually retired on that date, and subject to increases for accumulated sick leave.
141 “(5) If a participating eligible member dies while participating in the DROP and his
142 or her survivor is not eligible for benefits under section 12(k) of this subchapter, the participating
143 eligible member’s survivor shall receive the remainder of the participating eligible member’s
144 DROP account balance and the annuity that the survivor would have received had the participating
145 eligible member retired on the date he or she began participating in the DROP, as increased by the
146 cost-of-living adjustments that would have accrued if the participating eligible member had
147 actually retired on that date, and subject to increases for accumulated sick leave.
148 “(g) No later than 2 years after the effective date of this act, and every 5 years thereafter,
149 the Office of the Chief Financial Officer shall submit a report to the Mayor and Council that
150 analyzes:
151 “(1) The fiscal impact of the DROP;
152 “(2) Eligible members’ participation; and
153 “(3) The effect of the DROP on the retention of eligible members.”.
154 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
155 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
156 statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
157 October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
6

158 Sec. 4. Effective date.
159 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
160 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
161 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24,
162 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code §1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
163 Columbia Register.
7